West Virginia, session 2025, HB2568.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 2F. Alternative and Renewable Energy Portfolio Standard. §24-2F-8. Net metering and interconnection standards. [Repealed.]NOTE: The purpose of this bill is to eliminate net metering of public utilities.Strike-throughs indicate language that would be stricken from a heading or the present law and underscoring indicates new language that would be added. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home